Massachusetts, session 194th, H2908.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “agent;” in line 328, the following words:-  
“Massachusetts Department of Transportation Highway workers;”